Florida, session 2026, SB1428.
Be It Enacted by the Legislature of the State of Florida: 14 15 Section 1.â(1)âEach state university board of trustees, in 16 exercising its authority delegated by the Board of Governors of 17 the State University System, shall redesignate the following 18 roadways or portions of roadways, as applicable: 19 (a)âThe University of South Florida board of trustees shall 20 redesignate USF Alumni Drive as Charlie James Kirk Drive. 21 (b)âThe University of Central Florida board of trustees 22 shall redesignate Gemini Boulevard South as Charlie James Kirk 23 Boulevard. 24 (c)âThe Florida State University shall redesignate 25 Chieftain Way as Charlie James Kirk Road. 26 (d)âThe Florida Agricultural and Mechanical University 27 shall redesignate West Osceola Street as Charlie James Kirk 28 Street. 29 (e)âThe Florida Atlantic University shall redesignate 30 University Drive as Charlie James Kirk Drive. 31 (f)âThe Florida Gulf Coast University shall redesignate 32 FGCU Boulevard as Charlie James Kirk Boulevard. 33 (g)âThe Florida International University shall redesignate 34 Southwest 17th Street as Charlie James Kirk Street. 35 (h)âThe Florida Polytechnic University shall redesignate 36 Polytechnic Circle as Charlie James Kirk Circle. 37 (i)âNew College of Florida shall redesignate College Drive 38 as Charlie James Kirk Drive. 39 (j)âThe University of Florida shall redesignate Stadium 40 Road as Charlie James Kirk Road. 41 (k)âThe University of North Florida shall redesignate UNF 42 Drive as Charlie James Kirk Drive. 43 (l)âThe University of West Florida shall redesignate Campus 44 Drive as Charlie James Kirk Drive. 45 (2)âEach Florida College System institution board of 46 trustees, in exercising its authority delegated by the State 47 Board of Education, shall redesignate the following roadways or 48 portions of roadways, as applicable: 49 (a)âBroward College shall redesignate College Avenue as 50 Charlie James Kirk Avenue. 51 (b)âChipola College shall redesignate College Street as 52 Charlie James Kirk Street. 53 (c)âCollege of Central Florida shall redesignate Southwest 54 26th Street as Charlie James Kirk Street. 55 (d)âDaytona State College shall redesignate Pinecrest 56 Avenue as Charlie James Kirk Avenue. 57 (e)âEastern Florida State College shall redesignate Titan 58 Boulevard as Charlie James Kirk Boulevard. 59 (f)âFlorida Gateway College shall redesignate Southeast 60 College Place as Charlie James Kirk Drive. 61 (g)âThe College of the Florida Keys shall redesignate 62 College Road as Charlie James Kirk Road. 63 (h)âFlorida SouthWestern State College shall redesignate 64 FSW Parkway as Charlie James Kirk Parkway. 65 (i)âFlorida State College at Jacksonville shall redesignate 66 Broad Street as Charlie James Kirk Street. 67 (j)âGulf Coast State College shall redesignate College 68 Street as Charlie James Kirk Street. 69 (k)âHillsborough College shall redesignate West Tampa Bay 70 Boulevard from Air Cargo Road to North Dale Mabry Highway as 71 Charlie James Kirk Drive. 72 (l)âIndian River State College shall redesignate Cross 73 Campus Road as Charlie James Kirk Road. 74 (m)âLake-Sumter State College shall redesignate College 75 Drive as Charlie James Kirk Drive. 76 (n)âMiami Dade College shall redesignate Northeast 1st 77 Avenue as Charlie James Kirk Avenue. 78 (o)âNorth Florida College shall redesignate Mockingbird 79 Trail as Charlie James Kirk Drive. 80 (p)âNorthwest Florida State College shall redesignate 81 McCracken Way as Charlie James Kirk Drive. 82 (q)âPalm Beach State College shall redesignate Ersey Street 83 as Charlie James Kirk Street. 84 (r)âPasco-Hernando State College shall redesignate Mrs. 85 Prameela Musunuru Health and Wellness Trail as Charlie James 86 Kirk Trail. 87 (s)âPensacola State College shall redesignate College 88 Boulevard as Charlie James Kirk Boulevard. 89 (t)âPolk State College shall redesignate PSC Access Road as 90 Charlie James Kirk Road. 91 (u)âSt. Johns River State College shall redesignate Peoria 92 Cemetery Road as Charlie James Kirk Road. 93 (v)âSt. Petersburg College shall redesignate 5th Avenue 94 North as Charlie James Kirk Avenue. 95 (w)âSante Fe College shall redesignate Northwest 83rd 96 Street as Charlie James Kirk Street. 97 (x)âSeminole State College of Florida shall redesignate 98 College Drive as Charlie James Kirk Street. 99 (y)âSouth Florida State College shall redesignate College 100 Drive as Charlie James Kirk Drive. 101 (z)âState College of Florida, Manatee-Sarasota shall 102 redesignate 57th Avenue West as Charlie James Kirk Avenue. 103 (aa)âTallahassee State College shall redesignate Progress 104 Drive as Charlie James Kirk Drive. 105 (bb)âValencia College shall redesignate Valencia College 106 Drive as Charlie James Kirk Drive. 107 (3)âState funds shall be withheld from any state university 108 or Florida College System institution whose board of trustees 109 fails to redesignate the roadway or portion of a roadway listed 110 in subsections (1) and (2), respectively, within 90 days after 111 the effective date of this act. 112 Section 2.âThis act shall take effect upon becoming a law.